Vermont, session 2025-2026, H704.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 47, Sec. 44 is amended to read:
Sec. 44. TENANT REPRESENTATION PILOT PROGRAM
(a) Creation; purpose. Vermont Legal Aid shall create and administer a
two-year Tenant Representation Pilot Program:
VT LEG #385540 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.704
2026 Page 2 of 4
(1) to provide full representation to eligible and consenting tenants in
Lamoille and Windsor counties Vermont who have been served with a
summons and complaint for eviction; and
(2) to determine the impact of representation on the issuance of writs of
possession and homelessness prevention.
(b) Tenant eligibility. Vermont Legal Aid may enter a notice of appearance
on behalf of a residential tenant in Lamoille or Windsor County who is served
with a summons and complaint in an ejectment action, consents to the
representation, and meets the following criteria:
(1) household income equals or is less than 120 percent of State area
median income;
(2) the cost of rent equals or exceeds 30 percent of household income; or
(3) household expenses exceed income.
(c) Scope of representation.
(1) Full representation through the Program is limited to eviction.
(2) The pursuit of counterclaims shall be at the discretion of appointed
counsel.
(d) Conflicts of interest.
(1) Vermont Legal Aid may subcontract to Legal Services Vermont if it
is unable to provide tenant representation due to a conflict of interest as
defined by the Vermont Rules of Professional Conduct.
VT LEG #385540 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.704
2026 Page 3 of 4
(2) If Legal Services Vermont also has a conflict of interest, Vermont
Legal Aid may subcontract to one or more private counsels who are members
in good standing of the Vermont Bar.
(e) Report. Vermont Legal Aid shall provide interim reports on the
progress of the Program on or before November 15, 2023 November 30, 2025
and November 15, 2024 November 30, 2026, and a final report on or before
July 30, 2025 July 31, 2027, which shall describe:
(1) the number of tenants represented;
(2) case outcomes, including:
(A) the number of cases fully or partially resolved through access to
the Rent Arrears Assistance Fund;
(B) the number of cases fully or partially resolved through the
Vermont Landlord’s Association mediation program; and
(C) the number of cases fully or partially resolved through access to
another resource identified through the Rental Housing Stabilization Services
Program; and
(3) recommendations for policy changes and for pilot expansion.
(f) Implementation. The duty to implement this section is contingent upon
an appropriation in fiscal year 2024 2025 from the General Fund to the Agency
of Human Services for a subgrant to Vermont Legal Aid to provide
VT LEG #385540 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.704
2026 Page 4 of 4
representation in eligible eviction cases in the two pilot counties of Lamoille
and Windsor beginning on July 1, 2023 November 1, 2024.
Sec. 2. TENANT REPRESENTATION PILOT PROGRAM GRANT
UPDATE
The Agency of Human Services and Vermont Legal Aid shall update
existing grant agreements to implement the Tenant Representation Pilot
Program amendments under this act.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385540 v.2